Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3172.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 4.046, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Policy and strategy development. The subcabinet must engage in the following duties related to the development of opioid use, substance use, and addiction policy and strategy: (1) identify challenges and opportunities that exist relating to accessing treatment and support services and develop recommendations to overcome these barriers for all Minnesotans; (2) with input from affected communities, develop policies and strategies that will reduce barriers and gaps in service for all Minnesotans seeking treatment for opioid or substance use disorder, particularly for those Minnesotans who are members of communities disproportionately impacted by substance use and addiction; (3) develop policies and strategies that the state may adopt to expand Minnesota's recovery infrastructure, including detoxification or withdrawal management facilities, treatment facilities, and sober housing; (4) identify innovative services and strategies for effective treatment and support; (5) develop policies and strategies to expand services and support for people in Minnesota suffering from opioid or substance use disorder through partnership with the Opioid Epidemic Response Advisory Council and other relevant partnerships; (6) develop policies and strategies for agencies to manage addiction and the relationship it has with co-occurring conditions; (7) identify policies and strategies to address opioid or substance use disorder among Minnesotans experiencing homelessness; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (8) submit recommendations to the legislature addressing opioid use, substance use, and addiction in Minnesotadeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (9) develop and publish a comprehensive substance use and addiction plan for the state. The plan must establish goals and priorities for a comprehensive continuum of care for substance misuse and substance use disorder for Minnesota. All state agencies' operating programs related to substance use prevention, harm reduction, treatment, or recovery or that are administering state or federal funds for those programs shall set program goals and priorities in accordance with the state plan. Each state agency shall submit its relevant plans and budgets to the subcabinet for review upon request. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 254A.03, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Alcohol and Other Drug Abuse Section. There is hereby created an Alcohol and Other Drug Abuse Section in the Department of Human Services. This section shall be headed by a director. The commissioner may place the director's position in the unclassified service if the position meets the criteria established in section 43A.08, subdivision 1a. The section shall: (1) conduct and foster basic research relating to the cause, prevention and methods of diagnosis, treatment and recovery of persons with substance misuse and substance use disorder; deleted text begin (2) coordinate and review all activities and programs of all the various state departments as they relate to problems associated with substance misuse and substance use disorder; deleted text end deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end develop, demonstrate, and disseminate new methods and techniques for prevention, early intervention, treatment and recovery support for substance misuse and substance use disorder; deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end gather facts and information about substance misuse and substance use disorder, and about the efficiency and effectiveness of prevention, treatment, and recovery support services from all comprehensive programs, including programs approved or licensed by the commissioner of human services or the commissioner of health or accredited by the Joint Commission on Accreditation of Hospitals. The state authority is authorized to require information from comprehensive programs which is reasonable and necessary to fulfill these duties. When required information has been previously furnished to a state or local governmental agency, the state authority shall collect the information from the governmental agency. The state authority shall disseminate facts and summary information about problems associated with substance misuse and substance use disorder to public and private agencies, local governments, local and regional planning agencies, and the courts for guidance to and assistance in prevention, treatment and recovery support; deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end inform and educate the general public on substance misuse and substance use disorder; deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end serve as the state authority concerning substance misuse and substance use disorder by monitoring the conduct of diagnosis and referral services, research and comprehensive programs. The state authority shall submit a biennial report to the governor containing a description of public services delivery and recommendations concerning increase of coordination and quality of services, and decrease of service duplication and cost; deleted text begin (7) establish a state plan which shall set forth goals and priorities for a comprehensive continuum of care for substance misuse and substance use disorder for Minnesota. All state agencies operating substance misuse or substance use disorder programs or administering state or federal funds for such programs shall annually set their program goals and priorities in accordance with the state plan. Each state agency shall annually submit its plans and budgets to the state authority for review. The state authority shall certify whether proposed services comply with the comprehensive state plan and advise each state agency of review findings; deleted text end deleted text begin (8)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end make contracts with and grants to public and private agencies and organizations, both profit and nonprofit, and individuals, using federal funds, and state funds as authorized to pay for costs of state administration, including evaluation, statewide programs and services, research and demonstration projects, and American Indian programs; deleted text begin (9)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end receive and administer money available for substance misuse and substance use disorder programs under the alcohol, drug abuse, and mental health services block grant, United States Code, title 42, sections 300X to 300X-9; deleted text begin (10)deleted text end new text begin (8)new text end solicit and accept any gift of money or property for purposes of Laws 1973, chapter 572, and any grant of money, services, or property from the federal government, the state, any political subdivision thereof, or any private source;new text begin andnew text end deleted text begin (11)deleted text end new text begin (9)new text end with respect to substance misuse and substance use disorder programs serving the American Indian community, establish guidelines for the employment of personnel with considerable practical experience in substance misuse and substance use disorder, and understanding of social and cultural problems related to substance misuse and substance use disorder, in the American Indian community.